Utah statutes.
63M-1-1109.   Revocation of designations.

(1)  The office may revoke the designation of a recycling market development zone if no businesses utilize the tax incentives during any calendar year.

(2)  Before revocation of the zone, the office shall conduct a public hearing within a reasonable distance of the zone to determine reasons for inactivity and explore possible alternative actions.

